Utah statutes.
31A-5-402.   Shareholders' meetings.

(1)  Sections 16-10a-701, 16-10a-702, 16-10a-705, 16-10a-721, 16-10a-724, 16-10a-726, and 16-10a-728 apply to the meetings, notices, quorums, and voting of stock corporations.  Except where a greater percentage is required or allowed under this title, the articles of incorporation of domestic insurers may not require more than 50% of the shares represented for the approval of an action requiring shareholder approval.

(2)  Sections 16-10a-707 and 16-10a-720 apply to the closing of transfer books, the fixing of the record date, and the voting lists of stock corporations.

(3)  Section 16-10a-731 applies to stock corporations.  The transfer of shares to a voting trust does not preclude the trustor, or trustee, from being subject to Chapter 16.



Amended by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

